Vermont, session 2025-2026, S14.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 1901 is amended to read:
§ 1901. ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM
* * *
(b) The Secretary shall make coverage under the Dr. Dynasaur program
established in accordance with Title XIX (Medicaid) and Title XXI (SCHIP) of
the Social Security Act available to pregnant individuals of any age whose
modified adjusted gross income is at or below 312 percent of the federal
poverty level for the applicable family size.
(c) The Secretary may charge a monthly premium, in amounts set by the
General Assembly, per family for pregnant women individuals and children
eligible for medical assistance under Sections 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(III), (IV),
(VI), and (VII) of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, whose family income
exceeds 195 percent of the federal poverty level, as permitted under section
1902(r)(2) of that act. Fees collected under this subsection shall be credited to
the State Health Care Resources Fund established in section 1901d of this title
and shall be available to the Agency to offset the costs of providing Medicaid
services. Any co-payments, coinsurance, or other cost sharing to be charged
shall also be authorized and set by the General Assembly.
* * *
VT LEG #378936 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.14
2025 Page 3 of 4
Sec. 2. EXPANDING ELIGIBILITY FOR DR. DYNASAUR AND
MEDICAID; AGENCY OF HUMAN SERVICES; REPORT
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall examine the feasibility of;
consider the need for a federal waiver or an amendment to Vermont’s Global
Commitment to Health Section 1115 demonstration, or both, for; develop a
proposed implementation timeline and estimated costs of implementation for;
and estimate the programmatic costs of:
(1) expanding eligibility for Dr. Dynasaur to all Vermont residents up to
26 years of age with incomes at or below 312 percent of the federal poverty
level (FPL); and
(2) expanding eligibility for Medicaid for adults who are 26 years of age
or older but under 65 years of age and not pregnant to individuals with
incomes at or below 312 percent FPL.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, the Agency shall report to the House
Committees on Health Care and on Appropriations and to the Senate
Committees on Health and Welfare and on Appropriations regarding:
(1) the feasibility of expanding eligibility for Dr. Dynasaur and
Medicaid as set forth in subsection (a) of this section;
(2) any federal waiver or Section 1115 demonstration amendment
needed for the eligibility expansions;
VT LEG #378936 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.14
2025 Page 4 of 4
(3) the process for obtaining any necessary waiver or amendment and
the likelihood of receiving federal approval;
(4) the costs of the eligibility expansions, both programmatic costs and
technological and operational costs; and
(5) a reasonable timeline for implementing the eligibility expansions.
Sec. 3. APPROPRIATIONS
In fiscal year 2026, the sum of $600,000.00 in Global Commitment funds is
appropriated to the Agency of Human Services to implement the Dr. Dynasaur
eligibility expansion set forth in Sec. 1 of this act.
(1) In fiscal year 2026, the sum of $180,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Agency of Human Services, Global Commitment
appropriation for the State match for implementation of the Dr. Dynasaur
eligibility expansion set forth in Sec. 1 of this act.
(2) In fiscal year 2026, the sum of $420,000.00 in federal funds is
appropriated to the Agency of Human Services, Global Commitment
appropriation for implementation of the Dr. Dynasaur eligibility expansion set
forth in Sec. 1 of this act.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 1 (33 V.S.A. § 1901; Dr. Dynasaur eligibility expansion for
pregnant individuals) shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
(b) The remaining sections shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378936 v.1